Arkansas, session 2025, HB1032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-106. Ban on conversion therapy.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) "Conversion therapy" means any practice or treatment
administered to a person that seeks to change the person's sexual orientation
or gender identity, including without limitation efforts to change behaviors
or gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward persons of the same gender.
(B) "Conversion therapy" does not include counseling that
does not seek to change a person's sexual orientation or gender identity and:
(i) Assists a person undergoing a gender transition;
(ii) Provides acceptance, support, and understanding
to a person; or
(iii) Facilitates a person's coping, social support,
or identity exploration and development, including sexual orientation-neutral
intervention to prevent or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual
practices; and
(2) "Healthcare professional" means a person who is licensed,
*JMB069*
01-16-2025 14:43:46 JMB069

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1032
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession.
(b) A healthcare professional shall not engage in conversion therapy.
(c) A healthcare professional who engages in conversion therapy is
subject to disciplinary action by the licensing, certifying, or authorizing
state entity, including without limitation suspension or revocation of his or
her license, certificate, or authorization.

/s/A. Collins



























01-16-2025 14:43:46 JMB069